Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 3

Recalls

6-31-301. Board of education member — Petition.

Any member of the board of education of the city elected or appointed to fill a vacancy under this charter may be removed from office by the registered voters of the city.

The procedure to effect such removal shall be as follows:

A petition, signed by registered voters equal in number to at least sixty-six percent (66%) of the total vote cast for the candidate for the board of education receiving the highest number of votes at the last regular election, demanding the recall of the person sought to be removed shall be filed with the county election commission, and notice given by the commission of such filing by publication at least once in the official city newspaper, which petition shall contain a general statement of the grounds upon which the removal is sought. The signatures to the petition need not all be appended to one (1) paper, but each signer shall sign such signer's name, and shall place thereon, after such signer's name, the date of signing and such signer's place of residence by street and number or by other customary designation;

To each petition paper there shall be attached a sworn affidavit by the circulator thereof stating the number of signers thereto and that each signature thereon is the genuine signature of the person whose name it purports to be, and that it was made in the presence of the affiant;

Such petition shall be filed with the county election commission, which shall, within fifteen (15) days, canvass the signatures thereon to determine the sufficiency thereof;

A separate petition shall be filed for each person sought to be removed; and

The county election commission shall attach to such petition its certificate showing the result of the examination.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 3.14; 1959, ch. 139, § 1; 1972, ch. 740, § 4(54); T.C.A., § 6-3115.

Cross-References. Public schools, title 6, ch. 36.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

Collateral References.

Application of constitutional “compactness requirement” to redistricting. 114 A.L.R.5th 311.

State court jurisdiction over congressional redistricting disputes. 114 A.L.R.5th 387.

Sufficiency of particular charges as affecting enforceability of recall petition. 114 A.L.R.5th 1.

Sufficiency of technical and procedural aspects of recall petitions. 116 A.L.R.5th 1.

6-31-302. Board of education member — Amended petition.

If, by the certificate, the petition is shown to be insufficient, it may be amended within ten (10) days from the date of the certificate. The county election commission shall, within fifteen (15) days after such amendment, make the same examination as provided in § 6-31-301 of the amended petition, and, if its certificate shall hold the same to be insufficient, such petition shall be returned to the persons filing it.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 3.15; T.C.A., § 6-3116.

6-31-303. Board of education member — Calling election on recall.

If the county election commission's certificate shows that the petition is sufficient, the commission shall call an election on the question of recall.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 3.15; 1972, ch. 740, § 4(55); T.C.A., § 6-3117.

6-31-304. Board of education member — Recall election.

At such election, the voter shall vote either “for recall” or “against recall.” If sixty-six percent (66%) of those voting vote “for recall,” the person named shall be declared removed from office and the office declared vacant. Such vacancy shall be filled as directed in § 6-36-107. The method of removal shall be cumulative and additional to the methods heretofore existing by law. No more than one (1) election for the purpose of recall shall be held in any six-month period, and no such election shall be held within a period beginning ninety (90) days before and ending ninety (90) days after a regular municipal election.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 3.16; 1959, ch. 139, § 1; 1972, ch. 740, § 4(56); T.C.A., § 6-3118.

6-31-305. [Obsolete.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 6-31-305 concerning election of justice of the peace has been deemed obsolete in view of the repeal of Tenn. Const., art. VI, § 15 and the present provisions of §§ 5-5-101, 16-1-112, 16-15-101 and 16-15-501.

6-31-306. City council member — Removal.

Any council member of the city elected or appointed to fill a vacancy under this charter may be removed from office by the voters.

The procedure to effect the removal of the incumbent shall be as follows:

A petition, by registered voters equal in number to at least sixty-six percent (66%) of the total vote cast for the office held by the incumbent at the last regular election, demanding the recall of the person sought to be removed shall be filed with the county election commission, and notice given by the commission of such filing by publication at least once in the official city newspaper, which petition shall contain a general statement of the grounds upon which the removal is sought. The signatures to the petition need not all be appended to one (1) paper, but each signer shall sign such signer's name, and shall place thereon, after such signer's name, the date of signing and such signer's place of residence by street and number, or by other customary designation;

To each petition paper there shall be attached a sworn affidavit by the circulator thereof stating the number of signers thereto, that each signature thereon is the genuine signature of the person whose name it purports to be, and that it was made in the presence of the affiant;

Such petition shall be filed with the county election commission, which shall, within fifteen (15) days, canvass the signatures thereon to determine the sufficiency thereof;

A separate petition shall be filed for each person sought to be removed; and

The county election commission shall attach to such petition its certificate showing the result of the examination.

If the county election commission's certificate shows that the petition is sufficient, the commission shall call an election on the question of recall.

Acts 1959, ch. 140, § 1; 1972, ch. 740, § 4(57); T.C.A., § 6-3120.

6-31-307. City council member — Recall election.

At such election, voters shall vote either “for recall” or “against recall.” If sixty-six percent (66%) of those voters vote “for recall,” the person named shall be declared removed from office and the office declared vacant. Such vacancy shall be filled as directed in § 6-31-201. The method of removal shall be cumulative and additional to the methods heretofore existing by law. No more than one (1) election for the purpose of recall shall be held in any six-month period and no such election shall be held within a period beginning ninety (90) days before and ending ninety (90) days after a regular municipal election.

Acts 1959, ch. 140, § 1; 1972, ch. 740, § 4(58); T.C.A., § 6-3121.